Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1267
State investment officer; combine and pool investable funds; when; prorate interest.

For purposes of investment under the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, the state investment officer shall combine and pool all investable funds of all state agencies subject to his or her investment powers except when doing so would violate a fiduciary obligation of the state. The interest earned on any pooled investment shall be prorated in accordance with the participation of the respective funds.

Laws 1978, LB 258, § 7;

Laws 1985, LB 614, § 3.